Louisiana, session 2026, SB186.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:324 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§324. Menhaden seines; restrictions
A. All commercial menhaden companies utilizing vessels equipped with
purse seines operating in Louisiana territorial waters for the purpose of
reduction fishing shall take no more than three hundred fifteen million pounds
of menhaden from Louisiana territorial waters on an annual basis.
B. Anyone legally taking menhaden shall not have in their possession more
than five percent, by weight, of any species of fish other than menhaden and herring-
like species.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-16 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 186